Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 4 Transmitting Utility Act

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming Adopts the ‘1972 Amendments’ to Uniform Commercial Code Article 9 — The Revisions and Some Continuing Problems,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 581 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of electric company to one other than employee for injury or death arising from commencement or resumption of service, 46 ALR5th 423.

§ 37-4-101.
Citation.

This act [§§

37-4-101

through

37-4-104

] shall be known, and may be cited as, the “Transmitting Utility Act.”

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 37-4-102.
Definitions.

When used in this act [§§

37-4-101

through

37-4-104

], the following words, terms and phrases shall have the meaning prescribed to them in this section:

“Transmitting utility” means any corporation or other business entity primarily engaged, pursuant to rights or franchises issued by a state or federal regulatory body, in the railroad or street railway business, the telephone or telegraph business, the transmission of oil, gas or petroleum products by pipeline, or the transmission or the production and transmission of electricity, steam, gas or water;

“Uniform Commercial Code” means chapter 219, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1961, as amended [§§ 34.1-1-101 through 34.1-10-104].

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 124, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming Adopts the ‘1972 Amendments’ to Uniform Commercial Code Article 9 — The Revisions and Some Continuing Problems,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 581 (1984).

§ 37-4-103.
Filing security interests.

If filing is required under the Uniform Commercial Code, the proper place to file in order to perfect a security interest in personal property or fixtures of a transmitting utility is in the office of the secretary of state.

When the financing statement covers goods of a transmitting utility which are or are to become fixtures, no description of the real estate concerned is required.

A security interest in rolling stock of a transmitting utility may be perfected either as provided in section 20(c) of the Interstate Commerce Act or by filing a financing statement pursuant to the Uniform Commercial Code as provided in subsection (a).

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 124, § 3; 2001, ch. 137, § 3.

Interstate Commerce Act. —

Section 20 of the federal Interstate Commerce Act, referred to in subsection (c), appeared as 49 U.S.C. § 20 before being repealed in 1978.

§ 37-4-104.
Effect on Uniform Commercial Code and other laws.

Unless displaced by the specific provisions of this act [§§

37-4-101

through

37-4-104

], the Uniform Commercial Code and other applicable laws remain in full force and effect and supplement the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 124, § 4.

Uniform Commercial Code. —

See §§ 34.1-1-101 through 34.1-10-104.